Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-114.01
Clerk; daily journal; prepare; compile after session.

The Clerk of the Legislature shall prepare a daily journal of the proceedings of the Legislature. The Legislative Journal shall be compiled by the clerk after each regular session of the Legislature.

Laws 1973, LB 84, § 1;

Laws 1976, LB 718, § 1.